New York, session 2025-2026, S524.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding two new sections 250.51 2 and 250.52 to read as follows: 3 § 250.51 Voyeurism in the second degree. 4 A person is guilty of voyeurism in the second degree when: 5 1. For such person's own amusement, entertainment, profit, sexual 6 arousal or sexual gratification, or for the purpose of degrading or 7 abusing a person, such person (a) trespasses, as defined in section 8 140.05 of this part or (b) surreptitiously views a person using any 9 mechanical, digital, electronic viewing device, camera, cellular phone 10 or any other instrument that can be used to observe a person, for the 11 purpose of viewing a person dressing or undressing or the sexual or 12 other intimate parts of such person at a place and time when such person 13 has a reasonable expectation of privacy, as defined in subdivision one 14 of section 250.40 of this article, without such person's knowledge or 15 consent; or 16 2. For such person's own amusement, entertainment, profit, sexual 17 arousal or sexual gratification, or for the purpose of degrading or 18 abusing a person, such person (a) trespasses, as defined in section EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01389-02-6 S. 524--A 2 1 140.05 of this part or (b) surreptitiously views a person using any 2 mechanical, digital, electronic viewing device, camera, cellular phone 3 or any other instrument that can be used to observe a person, for the 4 purpose of viewing a person in an identifiable manner engaging in sexual 5 conduct, as defined in subdivision ten of section 130.00 of this part, 6 at a place and time when such person has a reasonable expectation of 7 privacy, as defined in subdivision one of section 250.40 of this arti- 8 cle, without such person's knowledge or consent. 9 Voyeurism in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor. 10 § 250.52 Voyeurism in the first degree. 11 A person is guilty of voyeurism in the first degree when such person 12 commits the crime of voyeurism in the second degree and has been previ- 13 ously convicted within the past ten years of voyeurism in the first or 14 second degree. 15 Voyeurism in the first degree is a class A misdemeanor. 16 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 250.65 of the penal law, as added by 17 chapter 69 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 18 1. The provisions of sections 250.45, 250.50, 250.51, 250.52, 250.55 19 and 250.60 of this article do not apply with respect to any: (a) law 20 enforcement personnel, firefighters, healthcare professionals or correc- 21 tional facility personnel engaged in the conduct of their authorized 22 duties; (b) security system wherein a written notice is conspicuously 23 posted on the premises stating that a video surveillance system has been 24 installed for the purpose of security; or (c) video surveillance devices 25 installed in such a manner that their presence is clearly and immediate- 26 ly obvious. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.